ru: Тип поршневой детали водного транспорта: Поршень; Стопорное кольцо поршня; Днище поршня; Выпуклая часть поршня; Поршнекомплект (поршень + кольца + палец + стопоры); Поршневой палец; Подшипник поршневого пальца; Комплект поршневых колец; Юбка поршня; Обжимка поршневых колец; Другое
cs: Typ pístové části plavidla: Píst; Pojistný kroužek pístu / svorka; Hlava pístu; Dno pístu; Sada pístu (píst + kroužky + čep + pojistky); Pístní čep; Ložisko pístního čepu; Sada pístních kroužků; Plášť pístu; Nástroj na stlačení kroužků; Jiné
de: Art des Kolbenteils für Wasserfahrzeuge: Kolben; Kolben-Sicherungsring/Haltering; Kolbenboden; Kolbendom; Kolben-Set (Kolben + Ringe + Bolzen + Clips); Kolbenbolzen; Kolbenbolzenlager; Kolbenring-Set; Kolbenschaft; Kolbenring-Spannband; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип бутален компонент за плавателен съд: Бутало; Зегерка/задържаща скоба на бутало; Чело на буталото; Купол на буталото; Бутален комплект (бутало + пръстени + болт + скоби); Бутален болт; Лагер на буталния болт; Комплект сегменти; Пола на буталото; Инструмент за свиване на сегменти; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta klipa plovila: Klip; Klipni uskočnik / pričvrsna kopča; Čelo klipa; Kupola klipa; Komplet klipa (klip + prstenovi + osovinica + uskočnici); Osovinica klipa; Ležaj osovinice klipa; Komplet klipnih prstenova; Plašt klipa; Alat za sabijanje klipnih prstenova; Ostalo
sv: Typ av kolvdel för vattenskoter: Kolv; Låsring för kolvbult; Kolvkrona; Kolvkupol; Kolvkit (kolv + ringar + bult + clips); Kolvbult; Kolvbultslager; Kolvringssats; Kolvmantel; Kolvringskompressor; Övrigt
lt-LT: Vandens transporto priemonės stūmoklio dalies tipas: Stūmoklis; Stūmoklio fiksavimo žiedas / laikantysis segtukas; Stūmoklio karūnėlė; Stūmoklio gaubtas; Stūmoklio komplektas (stūmoklis, žiedai, pirštas, fiksatoriai); Stūmoklio pirštas; Stūmoklio piršto guolis; Stūmoklio žiedų rinkinys; Stūmoklio sijonėlis; Žiedų suspaudimo įrankis; Kita
ja: 水上バイク用ピストン部品タイプ: ピストン; ピストンサークリップ/リテーニングクリップ; ピストンクラウン; ピストンドーム; ピストンキット (ピストン + リング + ピン + クリップ); ピストンピン (リストピン); ピストンピンベアリング; ピストンリングセット; ピストンスカート; リングコンプレッサーツール; その他
zh-CN: 船舶活塞部件类型: 活塞; 活塞卡簧/挡圈; 活塞顶冠; 活塞圆顶; 活塞套件（活塞 + 活塞环 + 活塞销 + 卡簧）; 活塞销; 活塞销轴承; 活塞环套件; 活塞裙部; 活塞环压缩工具; 其他
hu: Vízi jármű dugattyúalkatrészének típusa: Dugattyú; Dugattyú biztosítógyűrű/rögzítő; Dugattyútető; Dugattyúboltozat; Dugattyúkészlet (dugattyú + gyűrűk + csapszeg + klipek); Dugattyúcsapszeg; Dugattyúcsapszeg-csapágy; Dugattyúgyűrű-készlet; Dugattyúszoknya; Gyűrűösszenyomó szerszám; Egyéb
zh-TW: 船艇活塞零件類型: 活塞; 活塞扣環/固定夾; 活塞頂冠; 活塞凸頂; 活塞套件 (活塞 + 活塞環 + 活塞銷 + 扣環); 活塞銷 (腕銷); 活塞銷軸承; 活塞環組; 活塞裙; 活塞環壓縮工具; 其他
fr: Type de pièce de piston d’embarcation: Piston; Circlip/clip de maintien de piston; Tête de piston; Dôme de piston; Kit de piston (piston + segments + axe + clips); Axe de piston; Roulement d’axe de piston; Jeu de segments de piston; Jupe de piston; Outil de compression de segments; Autre
vi: Loại bộ phận piston tàu thủy: Pít-tông; Vòng hãm pít-tông/kẹp giữ; Đỉnh pít-tông; Nắp pít-tông; Bộ pít-tông (pít-tông + xéc măng + chốt + kẹp); Chốt pít-tông (chốt ngang); Vòng bi chốt pít-tông; Bộ xéc-măng pít-tông; Váy pít-tông; Dụng cụ nén xéc măng; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de peça do pistão da embarcação: Pistão; Anel de retenção/freio do pistão; Cabeça do pistão; Domo do pistão; Kit de pistão (pistão, anéis, cavilha e freios); Cavilha do pistão; Rolamento da cavilha do pistão; Conjunto de segmentos de pistão; Saia do pistão; Ferramenta de compressão de anéis; Outro
th: ประเภทลูกสูบเรือ: ลูกสูบ; แหวนล็อกสลักลูกสูบ/คลิปล็อก; หัวลูกสูบ; โดมลูกสูบ; ชุดลูกสูบ (ลูกสูบ + แหวน + สลัก + คลิป); สลักลูกสูบ (สลักก้านสูบ); ลูกปืนสลักลูกสูบ; ชุดแหวนลูกสูบ; กระโปรงลูกสูบ; เครื่องมือรัดแหวนลูกสูบ; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di componente del pistone del natante: Pistone; Anello elastico/clip di fissaggio del pistone; Testa del pistone; Cupola del pistone; Kit pistone (pistone + fasce + spinotto + fermi); Spinotto del pistone (spinotto); Cuscinetto dello spinotto del pistone; Set di fasce elastiche; Mantello del pistone; Strumento compressore per fasce; Altro
nl: Watervaartuig zuiger onderdeel type: Zuiger; Zuigerborgveer/borgklem; Zuigerkroon; Zuigerkoepel; Zuigerset (zuiger + veren + pen + clips); Zuigerpen; Zuigerpenlager; Zuigerverenset; Zuigermantel; Zuigerveertang; Overige
pt-BR: Embarcação pistão tipo de peça: Pistão; Anel de retenção do pistão/clipe de retenção; Coroa do pistão; Cúpula do pistão; Kit de pistão (pistão + anéis + pino + clipes); Pino do pistão (pino de articulação); Rolamento do pino do pistão; Conjunto de anéis do pistão; Saia do pistão; Ferramenta compressora de anéis; Outros
ro-RO: Tipul piesei pistonului pentru ambarcațiuni: Piston; Siguranță piston/clemă de reținere; Cap piston; Dom piston; Kit piston (piston + segmenți + bolț + siguranțe); Bolț piston; Rulment bolț piston; Set segmenți piston; Fustă piston; Dispozitiv de comprimare a segmenților; Altele
sk-SK: Typ piestovej časti plavidla: Piest; Poistný krúžok piestu; Koruna piestu; Klenba piestu; Súprava piestu (piest + krúžky + čap + poistky); Piestny čap; Ložisko piestneho čapu; Súprava piestnych krúžkov; Plášť piestu; Sťahovák piestnych krúžkov; Iné
es: Tipo de pieza de pistón para embarcaciones: Pistón; Anillo de seguridad del pistón/clip de retención; Cabeza del pistón; Cúpula del pistón; Kit de pistón (pistón + anillos + pasador + clips); Pasador del pistón (bulón); Cojinete de pasador del pistón; Juego de anillos de pistón; Falda del pistón; Herramienta compresora de anillos; Otro
ko: 선박용 피스톤 부품 유형: 피스톤; 피스톤 서클립/리테이닝 클립; 피스톤 크라운; 피스톤 돔; 피스톤 키트(피스톤 + 링 + 핀 + 클립); 피스톤 핀(리스트 핀); 피스톤 핀 베어링; 피스톤 링 세트; 피스톤 스커트; 링 압축기 도구; 기타
fi: Vesikulkuneuvon männän osan tyyppi: Mäntä; Männän lukkorengas; Männän laki; Männän kupu; Mäntäsarja (mäntä + renkaat + tappi + sokat); Männäntappi; Männäntapin laakeri; Männänrengassarja; Männän helma; Männänrenkaan puristin; Muu
en: Watercraft piston part type: Piston; Piston circlip/retaining clip; Piston crown; Piston dome; Piston kit (piston + rings + pin + clips); Piston pin (wrist pin); Piston pin bearing; Piston ring set; Piston skirt; Ring compressor tool; Other
nb: Båtens stempeltype: Stempel; Stempelsikringsring / låsering; Stempelkrone; Stempeltopp; Stempelsett (stempel + ringer + bolt + klips); Stempelbolt; Stempelboltlager; Stempelringsett; Stempelskjørt; Stempelringkompressor; Annet
tr: Deniz aracı piston parça tipi: Piston; Piston segmanı/tutucu klips; Piston tepesi; Piston kubbesi; Piston kiti (piston + segmanlar + pim + klipsler); Piston pimi; Piston pimi rulmanı; Piston segman seti; Piston eteği; Segman sıkıştırma aleti; Diğer
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος εμβόλου σκάφους: Πιστόνι; Ασφάλεια πιστονιού (circlip); Κεφαλή πιστονιού; Θόλος πιστονιού; Κιτ πιστονιού (πιστόνι + ελατήρια + πείρος + ασφάλειες); Πείρος πιστονιού; Ρουλεμάν πείρου πιστονιού; Σετ ελατηρίων πιστονιού; Φούστα πιστονιού; Εργαλείο συμπίεσης ελατηρίων; Άλλο
da: Stempelkomponent til fartøj: Stempel; Stempellåsering/holdeclips; Stempelkrone; Stempelkuppel; Stempelsæt (stempel + ringe + pind + clips); Stempelpind (krydspind); Stempelpindsleje; Stempelringsæt; Stempelskørt; Stempelringskompressorværktøj; Andet
pl: Typ części tłoka jednostki pływającej: Tłok; Pierścień osadczy/zabezpieczający tłoka; Denko tłoka; Wypukłość tłoka; Zestaw tłokowy (tłok + pierścienie + sworzeń + zabezpieczenia); Sworzeń tłokowy; Łożysko sworznia tłokowego; Komplet pierścieni tłokowych; Płaszcz tłoka; Narzędzie do ściskania pierścieni; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta batnega dela za plovilo: Bat; Vskočnik/zadrževalna sponka bata; Krona bata; Kupola bata; Komplet bata (bat + obročki + sornik + vskočniki); Sornik bata; Ležaj sornika bata; Komplet batnih obročkov; Krilo bata; Orodje za stiskanje obročkov; Drugo